Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Department Organization and Functions.

Sec. 44.42.010.
Commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities is the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977))

Sec. 44.42.020.
Powers and duties.

The department shall

plan, design, construct, and maintain all state modes of transportation and transportation facilities and all docks, floats, breakwaters, buildings, and similar facilities;

study existing transportation modes and facilities in the state to determine how they might be improved or whether they should continue to be maintained;

study alternative means of improving transportation in the state with regard to the economic costs of each alternative and its environmental and social effects;

develop a comprehensive, long-range, intermodal transportation plan for the state;

study alternatives to existing modes of transportation in urban areas and develop plans to improve urban transportation;

cooperate and coordinate with and enter into agreements with federal, state, and local government agencies and private organizations and persons in exercising its powers and duties;

manage, operate, and maintain state transportation facilities and all docks, floats, breakwaters, and buildings, including all state highways, vessels, railroads, pipelines, airports, and aviation facilities;

study alternative means of transportation in the state, considering the economic, social, and environmental effects of each alternative;

coordinate and develop state and regional transportation systems, considering deletions, additions, and the absence of alterations;

develop facility program plans for transportation and state buildings, docks, and breakwaters required to implement the duties set out in this section, including but not limited to functional performance criteria and schedules for completion;

supervise and maintain all state automotive and mechanical equipment, aircraft, and vessels, except vessels and aircraft used by the Department of Fish and Game or the Department of Public Safety; for state vehicles maintained by the department, the department shall, every five years, evaluate the cost, efficiency, and commercial availability of alternative fuels for automotive purposes, and the purpose for which the vehicles are intended to be used, and convert vehicles to use alternative fuels or purchase energy efficient vehicles whenever practicable; the department may participate in joint ventures with public or private partners that will foster the availability of alternative fuels for all automotive fuel consumers;

supervise aeronautics inside the state, under AS 02.10;

implement the safety and financial responsibility requirements for air carriers under AS 02.40;

inspect weights and measures;

at least every four years, study alternatives available to finance transportation systems in order to provide an adequate level of funding to sustain and improve the state’s transportation system.

The department may

engage in experimental projects relating to available or future modes of transportation and any means of improving existing transportation facilities and service;

exercise the power of eminent domain, including the declaration of taking as provided in AS 09.55;

publish plans, schedules, directories, guides, and manuals for distribution, with or without charge, to private or public entities or persons;

operate state housing in support of the department’s statutory responsibilities and charge rent that is consistent with applicable collective bargaining agreements, or, if no collective bargaining agreement is applicable, competitive with market conditions;

charge reasonable fees to cover the costs of issuing easements, licenses, and permits and to cover the costs of reproduction, printing, mailing, and distribution of contract and bid documents and design and construction standards manuals;

charge and collect fees for training services and technical assistance provided by department personnel.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977); am § 13 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 12 ch 83 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 50, § 10 (1981); am § 77 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 62 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 98 § 8 (1997); am § 2 ch 39 SLA 2005; am § 16 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For the responsibility and authority of the supreme court over state court facilities, see AS

22.05.025

.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

For state ferries (Alaska marine highway), see 17 AAC 70, art. 1.

For private sector use of marine highway system terminal facilities, see 17 AAC 70, art. 2.

For marine highway system procurement procedures, see 17 AAC 70, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (a)(11), substituted “and convert vehicles to use alternative fuels or purchase energy efficient vehicles whenever practicable” for “and convert or purchase vehicles to use alternative fuels whenever practicable”; made stylistic changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities can manage and operate a vessel maintenance facility under the authority of AS

44.42.020(a)(1)

and (a)(7) and AS

19.05.010

. July 1, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities possesses the authority to lease for operation a vessel maintenance facility it manages, by virtue of AS

44.42.020(a)(6)

and AS

19.05.040

. July 1, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.42.025.
Accounting and disposition of receipts. [Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.42.030.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement, interpret, or make more specific its powers and duties.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977))

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

For memorial sign program, see 17 AAC 8.

For encroachment permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 1.

For driveway and approach road permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 2.

For land disposal, see 17 AAC 10, art. 3.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

For local control of state public works projects, see 17 AAC 55.

For tourist-oriented directional signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 1.

For recreational and cultural interest area signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 3.

For tourist information kiosks, see 17 AAC 60, art. 5.

For state ferries (Alaska marine highway), see 17 AAC 70, art. 1.

For private sector use of marine highway system terminal facilities, see 17 AAC 70, art. 2.

For marine highway system procurement procedures, see 17 AAC 70, art. 3.

For relocation assistance services, see 17 AAC 81.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 85.

Sec. 44.42.040.
Departmental organization.

The commissioner shall establish regions within the state. The functions of the department within each region shall be performed, to the maximum extent feasible, through a regional office.
Each regional office shall be directed by a regional transportation and public facilities director appointed by the commissioner.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977))

Sec. 44.42.050.
State transportation plan.

The commissioner shall develop a comprehensive, intermodal, long-range transportation plan for the state. The commissioner shall incorporate the comprehensive long-range plan prepared under AS

19.65.011

into the plan developed under this section. The plan may be developed in multiple documents that address logical components, including geographic areas, modes of transportation, transportation corridors, systems, and other distinct subjects relevant to transportation planning. The components of the plan shall be revised as the commissioner determines appropriate. In developing and revising the state plan, the commissioner shall conform to the requirements for the eligibility and use of federal and other funds, as applicable. Upon approval of each component of the plan by the commissioner, the commissioner shall transmit notice of the approval of that component to the governor and to the legislature.

In developing and revising the plan, the commissioner shall seek public review and evaluation by any reasonable means and may

consult and cooperate with officials and representatives of the federal government, other governments, interstate commissions and authorities, local agencies and authorities, interested corporations and other organizations concerning problems affecting transportation in the state; and

request from an agency or other unit of the state government or of a political subdivision of it, or from a public authority, the assistance and data that may be necessary to enable the commissioner to carry out responsibilities under this section; every such entity shall provide the assistance and data requested.

Copies of the plan, as revised, shall be kept on file as a public document in the office of the commissioner and at each regional office of the department.

The commissioner shall develop a list of projects scheduled for design, construction, or other necessary activities for a period of not less than two years that is consistent with the plan developed under (a) of this section. The list of projects is in addition to the long-range plan required by (a) of this section. The list of projects must include an estimate of federal, state, and other funds anticipated to be received to fund the projects and a description, location, and itemization of the estimated cost for each project and the total cost of all projects.

In evaluating new highways, airports, terminals, ferries, and other major components for inclusion in the plan, the commissioner shall prepare a cost-effectiveness analysis using a consistent methodology. A cost-effectiveness analysis is not required for a project that involves the rehabilitation and maintenance of an existing transportation system or that primarily serves local transportation needs.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977); am §§ 3 — 5 ch 39 SLA 2005; am § 10 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, in (a), added the second sentence.

Sec. 44.42.055.
State public facilities plan. [Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 44.42.060.
Grants to the department.

The commissioner may apply for and accept, on behalf of the state, grants from the federal government or an agency of it, or from another state, a foundation, or any person, for any of the functions or purposes of the department.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977))

Sec. 44.42.065.
Conservation of energy in public buildings.

The department shall, at least once every seven years, perform an energy audit of each public building.

The department shall include in each energy audit required by (a) of this section recommendations for corrective measures to improve the energy efficiency and to minimize the life-cycle cost of the public building surveyed. These measures may include (1) energy conservation measures, (2) measures involving solar technology and other alternative energy systems, (3) energy management, and (4) maintenance and operating procedures and energy-related modifications. In recommending the corrective measures, the department shall give priority to changes in maintenance and operating procedures over measures requiring substantial structural modification or installation of equipment.

In this section, “energy audit” means a determination of

the energy consumption characteristics of a building, including the size, type, and rate of energy consumption of major energy-consuming systems of the building and the climate characterizing the region where the building is located; and

a determination of the energy conservation and cost savings likely to result from appropriate energy-conserving maintenance and operating procedures and modifications, including the purchase and installation of energy-related fixtures.

History.

(§ 14 ch 83 SLA 1980; am §§ 27, 28 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 56 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.42.067.
Retrofits and new construction for energy efficiency; energy efficiency report.

Not later than January 1, 2020, the department shall work with other state agencies to retrofit at least 25 percent of all public facilities, starting with those it determines are the least energy efficient, if the department determines that retrofitting the public facilities will result in a net savings in energy costs to the state within 15 years after completion of the retrofits for a public facility and if funding for the retrofits is available.

A retrofit or deferred maintenance of a public facility performed under this section, to the extent feasible, shall meet or exceed the most recently published edition of the ASHRAE/IESNA Standard 90.1, Energy Standard for Buildings Except for Low-Rise Residential Buildings, as published by the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers.

New construction of a public facility under this section shall meet or exceed the most recently published edition of the ASHRAE/IESNA Standard 90.1, Energy Standard for Buildings Except for Low-Rise Residential Buildings, as published by the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers.

Not later than January 1 of each year, the department, in consultation with the Department of Administration, shall submit a report to the legislature detailing the department’s progress in meeting the requirements of this section to reduce state energy consumption and costs and carrying out the duties listed in AS

44.42.020

as they relate to energy use. The department shall include in the report an analysis of the consumption and expense data recorded by the office of management and budget under AS

37.07.040

, comparing energy consumption levels in each year with past years to determine if reductions are being achieved.

In this section, “public facility” means a facility owned and controlled by the state for government or public use that is 10,000 square feet or more and is not a legislative building or court building.

History.

(§ 17 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Sec. 44.42.070.
Limitation on transportation facilities.

The department shall consult with the appropriate officials of other departments regarding environmental risks and economic and social considerations that may arise by reason of the location, design, construction, or reconstruction of a transportation facility.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977))

Sec. 44.42.080.
Capital projects funds. [Repealed, § 19 ch 61 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 44.42.085.
Comprehensive long-range community and public transportation plan.

The commissioner shall

prepare a comprehensive long-range plan for the development and improvement of coordinated community and public transportation; and

revise and update the plan at intervals determined by the commissioner.

The department shall submit the comprehensive long-range plan and revisions and updates of the plan to the governor and the legislature.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “, in consultation with the Alaska Community and Public Transportation Advisory Board,” following “commissioner” in the introductory paragraph.

Sec. 44.42.090.
Alaska Community and Public Transportation Advisory Board.

History.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 36, SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.42.095.
Powers, duties, and functions of the Alaska Community and Public Transportation Advisory Board.

History.

[[Repealed, § 3 ch 36, SLA 2012.]]